District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.186

Automatic suspension of license through affiliation.

(a)

Whenever a real estate broker’s license has been suspended or revoked pursuant to this subchapter, all real estate salespersons employed by that real estate broker must mail their licenses to the Mayor within 15 days of the revocation or suspension. It shall be unlawful for the real estate salesperson to perform any of the acts specified in this subchapter from the date of revocation or suspension until he or she has been reemployed and a license has been reissued to him or her by the Mayor.

(b)

When a real estate salesperson is discharged or terminates his or her employment with a licensee, the licensee, within 15 calendar days, shall mail notification to the former employee that his or her license has been mailed to the Mayor. A copy of the notice to the real estate salesperson shall accompany the license when it is mailed to the Mayor. It shall be unlawful for any real estate salesperson to perform any of the acts specified in this subchapter, under authority of the license issued pursuant to this subchapter, from the date of discharge or termination until the time he or she is employed by another licensee and a license is reissued to him or her by the Mayor.

(c)

When a real estate salesperson is discharged by or terminates his employment with a licensee it shall be the duty of the real estate salesperson to notify the Mayor in writing within 15 days. It shall be unlawful for the real estate salesperson to perform any of the acts specified in this statute from the date of discharge or termination until he or she has been employed by another licensee and a license is reissued to him or her by the Mayor.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.186.